Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-124
Highway Historical Markers; violations; penalty; malicious damage; recovery of replacement costs.

Any person who shall violate any of the provisions of sections 82-119 to 82-124 shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor. Each day that a violation continues after notice shall constitute a separate offense. Where the markers are damaged maliciously, the court shall collect the replacement costs as part of the punishment.

Laws 1957, c. 384, § 6, p. 1341;

R.R.S.1943, § 82-206;

Laws 1969, c. 811, § 6, p. 3049;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 307.